Washington statutes.
RCW 17.21.450

Application of certain pesticides by noncertified applicators—Standards adopted by rule.

The department shall adopt by rule standards for pesticide applications made by noncertified applicators of restricted use pesticides under the direct supervision of a certified applicator. Standards must be at least as effective as the federal certification and training standards for pesticide applicators and must include requirements for both the noncertified applicator and the certified applicator directly supervising the noncertified applicator.

[ 2023 c 186 s 4.]